Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.110

Jurisdiction.

The superior courts shall have jurisdiction of all civil actions and all felony criminal proceedings brought under this chapter. Courts of limited jurisdiction shall have jurisdiction of all misdemeanor and gross misdemeanor criminal actions brought under this chapter.

[ 1989 c 271 s 224.]